Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
REAPPROPRIATION: The amount of Twenty Million Dollars
($20,000,000.00) originally appropriated by Section 3 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 1019 of the 2nd Extraordinary Session of the 58th
Oklahoma Legislature, to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce from
the Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund of the State Treasury
created by Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for the
purpose to construct needed facility upgrades, such as fairground
arena connectors, electrical infrastructure, and facilities
associated with livestock events at a location where statewide
events commonly referred to as a "state fair" occurs in the central
region of the state, is hereby continued and reappropriated in the
current amount and for the original purpose, as adjusted for
transfer, less any amount that has been expended upon the effective
date of this act.

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2744 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2744 Page 3